Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 4
A

RTESIAN WELLS

12-5-150. Conditions under which artesian wells must be tapped.

The owner of any real property in this state on which any free-flowing artesian well is located or any person having immediate supervision over any real property in this state on which any free-flowing artesian well is located shall have any such artesian well tapped or shall otherwise stop the flow of any such well, except when in use, when the following conditions exist:

When the flow of any such artesian well is greater than one inch in diameter; and

When any such artesian well is located within a one-half-mile radius of any other free-flowing well.

(Ga. L. 1969, p. 669, § 1.)

12-5-151. Wells on government property.

In the event the State of Georgia or any agency thereof or any political subdivision of this state owns any real property affected by the provisions of Code Section 12-5-150, it shall be the duty of the person or persons having immediate supervision of such real property to comply with the requirements of Code Section 12-5-150 but the expenses involved in so complying shall be borne by the state agency or the political subdivision owning such real property, as the case may be.

(Ga. L. 1969, p. 669, § 2.)

12-5-152. Applicability of part.

This part shall not apply to any free-flowing artesian well which is in constant use for the purpose of watering and cooling livestock or for the purpose of supplying water to any public swimming pool.

(Ga. L. 1969, p. 669, § 4.)

12-5-153. Penalty.

It shall be the duty of any person owning or having supervision of any real property affected by this part to comply with the requirements of this part by not later than January 1, 1970. Any such person failing to comply with such requirements by such date shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. After such date, each day of continuing failure to comply with such requirements shall constitute a separate offense.

(Ga. L. 1969, p. 669, § 3.)